North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-02.1 North Dakota Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act
19-02.1-10.
Food — Misbranding defined. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A food must be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

If it is offered for sale under the name of another food.

If it is an imitation of another food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by section 19-02.1-08 or if it is an imitation of another food that is not subject to subsection 7, unless its label bears in type of uniform size and prominence the word imitation and immediately thereafter the name of the food imitated.

If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

If in package form, unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor;

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; and

In the case of beverages that are manufactured, distributed, and sold under a franchise or trademark name indicated thereon, whereby the person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company owning the franchise or trademark has control over the distribution, such beverages may be exempt from this subsection, if a certified statement is filed with the state department of health, stating the name and address of the manufacturer or distributor, and a statement signed by the manufacturer or distributor that they assume all responsibility and liability for the product named, which is being sold, or offered for sale, under such name within the area of the state designated, which certificate must be in the following form:

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by section 19-02.1-08 unless it conforms to such definition and standard, its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard, and, insofar as may be required by such regulations, the common names of optional ingredients, other than spices, flavoring, and coloring, present in such food.

If it purports to be or is represented as:

A food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations as provided by section 19-02.1-08 and its quality falls below such standard unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard; or

A food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by regulation as provided by section 19-02.1-08, and it falls below the standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subsection 7, unless it bears labeling clearly giving:

The common or usual name of the food, if any there be; and

The common or usual name of each such ingredient, in case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, except that spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings without naming each; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision is impracticable or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions must be established by regulations promulgated by the department and, provided further, that the requirements of this subdivision do not apply to food products which are packaged at the direction of purchasers at retail at the time of sale, the ingredients of which are disclosed to the purchasers by other means in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.

If it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the department determines to be, and by regulations prescribes as, necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for such uses.

If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it bears labeling stating that fact; provided, that the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subsection is impracticable, exemptions must be established by regulations promulgated by the department.

If it is a product intended as an ingredient of another food and when used according to the directions of the purveyor will result in the final food product being adulterated or misbranded.

If it is a color additive unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive prescribed under the provisions of the federal act.

If it is a raw agricultural commodity that is the produce of the soil, bearing or containing a pesticide chemical applied after harvest, unless the shipping container of the commodity bears labeling that declares the presence of the chemical in or on the commodity and the common or usual name and the function of the chemical. No such declaration is required while the commodity, having been removed from the shipping container, is being held or displayed for sale at retail out of the container in accordance with the custom of the trade.

If its packaging or labeling is in violation of an applicable regulation issued under section 3 or 4 of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970.

NORTH DAKOTA STATE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH BISMARCK, NORTH DAKOTA BEVERAGE LABELING EXEMPTIONS CERTIFICATE I, , the undersigned, an agent of and having authority to sign, do hereby certify that the following information is correct: Name and address of company requesting exemption Name Street Address City or Town State Name of Product Brand Name In order to be exempt from subdivisions a and b of subsection 5 of , relating to misbranding of food, which requires the name and address of the real manufacturer or other persons responsible for placing the product upon the market, I, the undersigned, do bind the company listed above by agreeing to assume all responsibility for the product named in this certificate which is being sold, or offered for sale under such name and brand name within the area consisting of in the State of North Dakota. section 19-02.1-10 of the North Dakota Century Code Note: The area must be designated by counties or other legal subdivisions of the city, county, or state. Firm Signed Title Address Note: If signed by a person other than an officer of the company, authorization for signature must accompany this form. This certificate must be acknowledged.

Click to view

Provided, that under subdivision b reasonable variations must be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages must be established, by regulations prescribed by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 11; 1971, ch. 234, § 1; 1989, ch. 264, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Note.

Sections 3 and 4 of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970, referred to in subsection 15 of this section, are compiled at 15 USCS, §§ 1472 and 1473, respectively.

Collateral References.

Horsemeat: validity and construction of statutes, ordinances, or regulations concerning the sale of horsemeat for human consumption, 19 A.L.R.2d 1013.

Coloring matter as forbidden adulteration of food as affected by truthful labeling, 56 A.L.R.2d 1129.

19-02.1-10.
Food — Misbranding defined. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A food must be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

If it is offered for sale under the name of another food.

If it is an imitation of another food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by section 19-02.1-08 or if it is an imitation of another food that is not subject to subsection 7, unless its label bears in type of uniform size and prominence the word imitation and immediately thereafter the name of the food imitated.

If its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

If in package form, unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor;

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; and

In the case of beverages that are manufactured, distributed, and sold under a franchise or trademark name indicated thereon, whereby the person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company owning the franchise or trademark has control over the distribution, such beverages may be exempt from this subsection, if a certified statement is filed with the department, stating the name and address of the manufacturer or distributor, and a statement signed by the manufacturer or distributor that they assume all responsibility and liability for the product named, which is being sold, or offered for sale, under such name within the area of the state designated, which certificate must be in the following form:

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by section 19-02.1-08 unless it conforms to such definition and standard, its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard, and, insofar as may be required by such regulations, the common names of optional ingredients, other than spices, flavoring, and coloring, present in such food.

If it purports to be or is represented as:

A food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations as provided by section 19-02.1-08 and its quality falls below such standard unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard; or

A food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by regulation as provided by section 19-02.1-08, and it falls below the standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subsection 7, unless it bears labeling clearly giving:

The common or usual name of the food, if any there be; and

The common or usual name of each such ingredient, in case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, except that spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings without naming each; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision is impracticable or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions must be established by regulations promulgated by the department and, provided further, that the requirements of this subdivision do not apply to food products which are packaged at the direction of purchasers at retail at the time of sale, the ingredients of which are disclosed to the purchasers by other means in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.

If it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the department determines to be, and by regulations prescribes as, necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for such uses.

If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it bears labeling stating that fact; provided, that the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subsection is impracticable, exemptions must be established by regulations promulgated by the department.

If it is a product intended as an ingredient of another food and when used according to the directions of the purveyor will result in the final food product being adulterated or misbranded.

If it is a color additive unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive prescribed under the provisions of the federal act.

If it is a raw agricultural commodity that is the produce of the soil, bearing or containing a pesticide chemical applied after harvest, unless the shipping container of the commodity bears labeling that declares the presence of the chemical in or on the commodity and the common or usual name and the function of the chemical. No such declaration is required while the commodity, having been removed from the shipping container, is being held or displayed for sale at retail out of the container in accordance with the custom of the trade.

If its packaging or labeling is in violation of an applicable regulation issued under section 3 or 4 of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970.

NORTH DAKOTA STATE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES BISMARCK, NORTH DAKOTA BEVERAGE LABELING EXEMPTIONS CERTIFICATE I, , the undersigned, an agent of and having authority to sign, do hereby certify that the following information is correct: Name and address of company requesting exemption Name Street Address City or Town State Name of Product Brand Name In order to be exempt from subdivisions a and b of subsection 5 of , relating to misbranding of food, which requires the name and address of the real manufacturer or other persons responsible for placing the product upon the market, I, the undersigned, do bind the company listed above by agreeing to assume all responsibility for the product named in this certificate which is being sold, or offered for sale under such name and brand name within the area consisting of in the State of North Dakota. section 19-02.1-10 of the North Dakota Century Code Note: The area must be designated by counties or other legal subdivisions of the city, county, or state. Firm Signed Title Address Note: If signed by a person other than an officer of the company, authorization for signature must accompany this form. This certificate must be acknowledged.

Click to view

Provided, that under subdivision b reasonable variations must be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages must be established, by regulations prescribed by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 11; 1971, ch. 234, § 1; 1989, ch. 264, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 82, effective September 1, 2022.

19-02.1-10.1.
Eggs — Labeling and temperature rules.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may adopt appropriate rules under chapter 28-32 to establish standards for proper labeling and temperature during the retail storage and sale of shell eggs. As used in this section, “eggs” means eggs in the shell which are the product of a domesticated chicken.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, §
9, effective July 1, 2017.

19-02.1-10.1.
Eggs — Labeling and temperature rules. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department may adopt appropriate rules under chapter 28-32 to establish standards for proper labeling and temperature during the retail storage and sale of shell eggs. As used in this section, “eggs” means eggs in the shell which are the product of a domesticated chicken.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, §
9, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 83, effective September 1, 2022.

19-02.1-11.
Emergency permit control.

Whenever the department finds after investigation that the distribution in the state of North Dakota of any class of food may, by reason of contamination with micro-organisms during manufacture, processing, or packing thereof in any locality, be injurious to health and that such injurious nature cannot be adequately determined after such articles have entered commerce, it then, and in such case only, shall promulgate regulations providing for the issuance, to manufacturers, processors, or packers of such class of food in such locality, of permits to which must be attached such conditions governing the manufacture, processing, or packaging, or packing of such class of food, for such temporary period of time, as may be necessary to protect the public health; and after the effective date of such regulations, and during such temporary period, no person may introduce or deliver for introduction into commerce any such food manufactured, processed, or packed by any such manufacturer, processor, or packer unless such manufacturer, processor, or packer holds a permit issued by the department as provided by such regulations.

The department is authorized to suspend immediately upon notice any permit issued under authority of this section if it is found that any of the conditions of the permit have been violated. The holder of a permit so suspended is privileged at any time to apply for the reinstatement of such permit, and the department shall, immediately after prompt hearing and inspection of the establishment, reinstate such permit if it is found that adequate measures have been taken to comply with and maintain the conditions of the permit, as originally issued, or as amended.

Any officer or employee duly designated by the department shall have access to any factory or establishment, the operator of which holds a permit from the department for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the conditions of the permit are being complied with, and denial of access for such inspection is grounds for suspension of the permit until such access is freely given by the operator.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 12; 1989, ch. 264, § 5.

19-02.1-12.
Food — Tolerances for added poisonous ingredients.

Any added poisonous or deleterious substance, any food additive, any pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity, or any color additive shall with respect to any particular use or intended use be deemed unsafe for the purpose of application of subsection 2 of section 19-02.1-09 with respect to any food, subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-13 with respect to any drug or device, or subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-17 with respect to any cosmetic, unless there is in effect a regulation pursuant to subsection 2 limiting the quantity of such substance, and the use or intended use of such substance conforms to the terms prescribed by such regulation. While such regulation relating to such substance is in effect, a food, drug, or cosmetic may not, by reason of bearing or containing such substance in accordance with the regulation, be considered adulterated within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-09, subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-13, or subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-17.

The department, whenever public health or other considerations in the state so require, is authorized to adopt, amend, or repeal regulations whether or not in accordance with regulations promulgated under the federal act prescribing therein tolerances for any added poisonous or deleterious substances, for food additives, for pesticide chemicals in or on raw agricultural commodities, or for color additives, including zero tolerances, and exemptions from tolerances in the case of pesticide chemicals in or on raw agricultural commodities, and prescribing the conditions under which a food additive or a color additive may be safely used and exemptions when such food additive or color additive is to be used solely for investigational or experimental purposes, upon its own motion or upon the petition of any interested party requesting that such a regulation be established, and it is incumbent upon such petitioner to establish by data submitted to the department that a necessity exists for such regulation, and that its effect will not be detrimental to the public health. If the data furnished by the petitioner is not sufficient to allow the department to determine whether such regulation should be promulgated, the department may require additional data to be submitted and failure to comply with the request is sufficient grounds to deny the request. In adopting, amending, or repealing regulations relating to such substances, the department shall consider among other relevant factors the following which the petitioner, if any, shall furnish:

The name and all pertinent information concerning such substance, including where available, its chemical identity and composition, a statement of the conditions of the proposed use, including directions, recommendations, and suggestions and including specimens of proposed labeling, and all relevant data bearing on the physical or other technical effect and the quantity required to produce such effect;

The probable composition of any substance formed in or on a food, drug, or cosmetic resulting from the use of such substance;

The probable consumption of such substance in the diet of man and animals taking into account any chemically or pharmacologically related substance in such diet;

Safety factors which, in the opinion of experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety of such substances for the use or uses for which they are proposed to be used, are generally recognized as appropriate for the use of animal experimentation data;

The availability of any needed practicable methods of analysis for determining the identity and quantity of such substance in or on an article, any substance formed in or on such article because of the use of such substance, and the pure substance and all intermediates and impurities; and

Facts supporting a contention that the proposed use of such substance will serve a useful purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 13.

19-02.1-12.1
Misrepresentation of cell-cultured protein as meat food product prohibited.

A person may not advertise, offer for sale, sell, or misrepresent cell-cultured protein as a meat food product. A cell-cultured food product:

May not be packaged in the same, or deceptively similar, packaging as a meat food product; and

Must be labeled as a cell-cultured food product.

For purposes of this section, “deceptively similar” means packaging that could mislead a reasonable person to believe the product is a meat food product.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 67, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

19-02.1-13.
Drugs and devices — Adulteration defined.

A drug or device must be deemed to be adulterated:

If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have been contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health.

If it is a drug and the methods used in, or the facilities or controls used for, its manufacture, processing, packing, or holding do not conform to or are not operated or administered in conformity with current good manufacturing practice to assure that such drug meets the requirements of this chapter as to safety and has the identity and strength, and meets the quality and purity characteristics, which it purports or is represented to possess.

If it is a drug and its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

If it is a drug and it bears or contains, for purposes of coloring only, a color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12 or it is a color additive, the intended use of which in or on drugs is for purposes of coloring only, and is unsafe within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12.

If it purports to be or is represented as a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, and its strength differs from, or its quality or purity falls below, the standard set forth in such compendium. Such determination as to strength, quality, or purity must be made in accordance with the tests or methods of assay set forth in such compendium or, in the absence of or inadequacy of such tests or methods of assay, those prescribed under authority of the federal act. No drug defined in an official compendium may be deemed to be adulterated under this subsection because it differs from the standard of strength, quality, or purity therefor set forth in such compendium if its difference in strength, quality, or purity from such standard is plainly stated on its label. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States pharmacopoeia and the homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States it is subject to the requirements of the United States pharmacopoeia unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it is subject to the provisions of the homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States and not to those of the United States pharmacopoeia.

If it is not subject to the provisions of subsection 6 and its strength differs from, or its purity or quality falls below, that which it purports or is represented to possess.

If it is a drug and any substance has been mixed or packed therewith so as to reduce its quality or strength or substituted wholly or in part therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 14.

19-02.1-14.
Drugs and devices — Misbranding defined.

A drug or device must be deemed to be misbranded:

If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

If in package form unless it bears a label containing:

The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that under this subdivision reasonable variations must be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages must be allowed, in accordance with regulations prescribed by the department or issued under the federal act.

If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

If it is for use by man and contains any quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic substance alpha-eucaine, barbituric acid, beta-eucaine, bromal, cannabis, carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marijuana, morphine, opium, paraldehyde, peyote, or sulfonmethane, or any chemical derivative of such substance, which derivative, after investigation, has been found to be and designated as, habit-forming, by regulations issued by the department under this chapter, or by regulations issued pursuant to section 502(d) of the federal act, unless its label bears the name and quantity or proportion of such substance or derivative and in juxtaposition therewith the statement “Warning — May be habit-forming”.

If it is a drug, unless its label bears, to the exclusion of any other nonproprietary name, except the applicable systematic chemical name or the chemical formula:

The established name, as defined in subsection 6, of the drug, if such there be; and

The established name and quantity of each active ingredient, in case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, including the kind and quantity or proportion of any alcohol, and also including, whether active or not, the established name and quantity or proportion of any bromides, ether, chloroform, acetanilid, acetophenetidin, amidopyrine, antipyrine, atropine, hyoscine, hyoscyamine, arsenic, digitalis, digitalis glucosides, mercury, ouabain, strophanthin, strychnine, thyroid, or any derivative or preparation of any such substances, contained therein.

As used in subsections 5 and 6, the term “established name”, with respect to a drug or ingredient thereof, means:

The applicable official name designated pursuant to section 508 of the federal act;

If there is no such name and such drug, or such ingredient, is an article recognized in an official compendium, then the official title thereof in such compendium; or

If neither subdivision a nor b applies, then the common or usual name, if any, of such drug or of such ingredient.

Unless its labeling bears:

Adequate directions for use; and

Such adequate warnings against use in those pathological conditions or by children when its use may be dangerous to health, or against unsafe dosage or methods or duration of administration or application, in such manner and form, as are necessary for the protection of users.

If it purports to be a drug the name of which is recognized in an official compendium, unless it is packaged and labeled as prescribed therein; provided, that the method of packing may be modified with the consent of the department, or if consent is obtained under the federal act. Whenever a drug is recognized in both the United States pharmacopeia and the homeopathic pharmacopeia of the United States, it is subject to the requirements of the United States pharmacopeia with respect to packaging and labeling unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case it is subject to the provisions of the homeopathic pharmacopeia of the United States and not to those of the United States pharmacopeia; provided, further, that in the event of inconsistency between the requirements of this subsection and those of subsections 5 and 6 as to the name by which the drug or its ingredients must be designated, the requirements of subsections 5 and 6 must prevail.

If it has been found by the department or under the federal act to be a drug liable to deterioration, unless it is packaged in such form and manner, and its label bears a statement of such precautions, as the regulations issued by the department or under the federal act require as necessary for the protection of public health. No such regulation may be established for any drug recognized in an official compendium until the department shall have informed the appropriate body charged with the revision of such compendium of the need for such packaging or labeling requirements and such body shall have failed within a reasonable time to prescribe such requirements.

If it is a drug and:

Its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading;

If it is an imitation of another drug; or

If it is offered for sale under the name of another drug.

If it is dangerous to health when used in the dosage, or with the frequency or duration prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof.

If it is, or purports to be, or is represented as a drug composed wholly or partly of insulin, unless it is from a batch with respect to which a certificate or release has been issued pursuant to section 506 of the federal act, and such certificate or release is in effect with respect to such drug.

If it is, or purports to be, or is represented as a drug composed wholly or partly of any kind of penicillin, streptomycin, chlortetracycline, chloramphenicol, bacitracin, or any other antibiotic drug, or any derivative thereof, unless it is from a batch with respect to which a certificate or release has been issued pursuant to section 507 of the federal act, and such certificate or release is in effect with respect to such drug; provided, that this subsection does not apply to any drug or class of drugs exempted by regulations promulgated under section 507(c) or (d) of the federal act. For the purpose of this subsection, the term “antibiotic drug” means any drug intended for use by man containing any quantity of any chemical substance which is produced by a micro-organism and which has the capacity to inhibit or destroy micro-organisms in dilute solution, including the chemically synthesized equivalent of any such substance.

If it is a color additive, the intended use of which in or on drugs is for the purpose of coloring only, unless its packaging and labeling are in conformity with such packaging and labeling requirements applicable to such color additive, prescribed under the provisions of subsection 2 of section 19-02.1-12 or of the federal act.

In the case of any prescription drug distributed or offered for sale in this state, unless the manufacturer, packer, or distributor thereof includes in all advertisements and other descriptive printed matter issued or caused to be issued by the manufacturer, packer, or distributor with respect to that drug a true statement of the established name as defined in subsection 6, the formula showing quantitatively each ingredient of such drug to the extent required for labels under section 502(e) of the federal act, and such other information in brief summary relating to side effects, contraindications, and effectiveness as are required in regulations issued under the federal act.

If a trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any likeness of the foregoing has been placed thereon or upon its container with intent to defraud.

Drugs and devices which are, in accordance with the practice of the trade, to be processed, labeled, or repacked in substantial quantities at establishments other than those where originally processed or packed are exempt from any labeling or packaging requirements of this chapter; provided, that such drugs and devices are being delivered, manufactured, processed, labeled, repacked, or otherwise held in compliance with regulations issued by the department, or under the federal act.

If it is a device and it has an established name, unless its label bears, to the exclusion of any other nonproprietary name, its established name, as defined in subsection 6, prominently printed in type at least half as large as that used thereon for any proprietary name or designation for the device, except that to the extent compliance with the requirements of this subsection is impracticable, exemptions will be established by rules adopted by the department. As used in this subsection, the term “established name” with respect to a device means:

The applicable official name of the device designated pursuant to federal law.

If there is no official name of the device designated pursuant to federal law and the device is an article recognized in an official compendium, then the official title of the device in the compendium.

If neither subdivision a nor subdivision b applies, then any common or usual name of the device.

If it is a device subject to a performance standard established under federal law, unless it bears labeling prescribed in the performance standard.

Provided, that the requirement for stating the quantity of the active ingredients, other than the quantity of those specifically named in this subsection applies only to prescription drugs; provided, further, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of subdivision b of subsection 6 is impracticable, exemptions must be allowed under regulations promulgated by the department, or under the federal act.

Provided, further, that when subdivision b applies to an article recognized in the United States pharmacopeia and in the homeopathic pharmacopeia under different official titles, the official title used in the United States pharmacopeia applies unless it is labeled and offered for sale as a homeopathic drug, in which case the official title used in the homeopathic pharmacopeia applies.

Provided, that if any requirement of subdivision a, as applied to any drug or device, is not necessary for the protection of the public health, the department shall promulgate regulations exempting such drug or device from such requirements; provided, further, that articles exempted under regulations issued under section 502(f) of the federal act may also be exempt.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 15; 1989, ch. 264, § 6.